California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(B) The county CalWORKs system improvement plan shall include a peer CalWORKs services review element, the purpose of which shall be to provide additional insight and technical assistance by peer counties for each county.

(C) Strategic focus areas for the county CalWORKs system improvement plan shall be determined by the county, informed by the county CalWORKs self-assessment process, as described in paragraph (2), with targets for improvement based upon what is learned in the county CalWORKs self-assessment process.

(D) The county human services agency shall complete an annual progress report on the status of its submitted system improvement plan and shall submit these reports to the department. The department, in consultation with the workgroup, shall develop uniform elements of the progress report.

(e) (1) The department shall receive, review, and, based on its determination of the county CalWORKs system improvement plan meeting the required elements identified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d), certify as complete all county-submitted performance indicator data, county CalWORKs self-assessments, county CalWORKS system improvement plans, and annual progress reports, and shall identify and promote the replication of best practices in CalWORKs
 service delivery to achieve the established process and outcome measures.

(2) The department shall monitor, on an ongoing basis, county performance on the measures developed pursuant to subdivision (d).

(3) The department shall make data collected pursuant to this section publicly available on its internet website.

(4) The department shall, on an annual basis, submit a report to the Legislature that summarizes county performance on the established process and outcome measures during the reporting period, analyzes county performance trends over time, and makes findings and recommendations for common CalWORKs services improvements identified in the county CalWORKs self-assessments and county CalWORKs system improvement plans, including information on common statutory, regulatory, or fiscal barriers identified as inhibiting system improvements and any recommendations to overcome those barriers.

(5) (A) The department shall facilitate the provision of, and provide as
 appropriate, technical assistance to county human services agencies as part of the peer review that supports the county’s selected areas for improvement as described in its system improvement plan.

(B) If, in the course of its review of county CalWORKs system improvement plans and annual updates, or, in the course of its review of regularly submitted performance indicator data, the department determines that a county is consistently failing to make progress toward its strategic focus areas for improvement or is consistently failing to meet the process measure standard target thresholds established pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), the department shall engage the county in a process of targeted technical assistance and support to address and resolve the identified shortcomings. If, after the assistance is provided, the county continues in its failure to meet its goals or performance thresholds, the department may
 engage in corrective action with the county.

(f) A county shall execute and fulfill components of its CalWORKs system improvement plan that can be accomplished with existing resources.

(g) A county shall not be required to execute and fulfill any components of its CalWORKs system improvement plan that creates new county costs, unless funding for those costs are appropriated in the annual Budget Act.

(h) The implementation of the Cal-OAR continuous quality improvement components, including county self-assessments, system improvement plans, peer reviews, progress reports, and data validation shall be optional to counties during the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(i) Beginning in the 2019–20 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, no more than two million dollars ($2,000,000) from the General Fund shall be appropriated in the annual Budget Act to counties to complete the requirements described in subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 67.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

11523.1.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to make the CalWORKs program the most effective family antipoverty program in the country. California continues to be a national leader in total caseload, provision of cash assistance, welfare-to-work services, and assistance for children. California is a national leader in improving the quality of life for CalWORKs families, including the elimination of the “maximum family grant rule,” as described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 11450.025, and the commitment to ending deep poverty among all CalWORKs families.

(b) Beginning in the 2019–20 fiscal year and continuing through the 2023–24 fiscal year, California embarks on the first cycle of a new CalWORKs innovation, the CalWORKs Outcome and Accountability Review (Cal-OAR) system. Cal-OAR establishes a local, data-driven program management system that facilitates continuous improvement of county CalWORKs programs by collecting, analyzing, and disseminating outcomes and best practices. This system will help achieve the state’s goals of ensuring that CalWORKs families receive the best possible services and supports to improve their lives and will also help the state meet federal work participation rates by emphasizing quality and engagement.

(c) At the same time, county human services agencies are transforming the welfare-to-work process away from a compliance-oriented and work-first model into a modern,
 science-based, and goal-oriented welfare-to-work model known locally as CalWORKs 2.0. The success of this approach depends on a culture shift away from compliance-oriented, directive case management and toward supportive and responsive interactions between the case manager and the customer. Case management emphasizes coaching that allows clients to naturally develop accountability by setting and achieving their goals. Case managers in CalWORKs 2.0 have a framework to provide customers a trajectory from stability, to upskilling, to employment.

(d) Cal-OAR and the county CalWORKs 2.0 initiative are bold steps toward a better CalWORKs program, yet state law has not been updated to be consistent with the new approaches.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 69.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

11523.4.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The Legislature has taken numerous steps in recent years to improve the CalWORKs program for the families who rely on it. These changes have moved California towards a more modern and compassionate approach to alleviating family poverty, and are grounded in awareness of the social determinants of health, adverse childhood experiences, and the neurotoxicity and trauma of intergenerational poverty.

(2) County human services departments have led a redesign of the welfare-to-work program, known as CalWORKs 2.0, over the past five years. CalWORKs 2.0 is based on input gathered from program participants, employment
 services staff, and other stakeholders, as well as recent behavioral science research. The redesigned approach to welfare-to-work engagement focuses on mutual engagement between county staff and clients, that helps families set and achieve personalized goals directly relevant to their lives. This approach requires more individualized case management, tailored to families’ and individuals’ needs and strengths.

(3) The Legislature adopted a new CalWORKs Outcome and Accountability Review (Cal-OAR) system in 2017. Cal-OAR establishes a locally focused, data-driven program management system that facilitates continuous improvement of county CalWORKs programs by collecting, analyzing, and disseminating outcomes and best practices. Cal-OAR has the potential to transform the CalWORKs program from one which focuses on work participation as the primary measure of success to one which measures a wide variety of real-life, participant-centered outcomes.

(4) The COVID-19 pandemic and the disproportionate health and economic impacts of the pandemic on low-income persons, exacerbated within communities of color, make it even more clear how urgent and necessary implementation of CalWORKs 2.0 and Cal-OAR principles are in helping impoverished families and people of color, who are disproportionately represented in the program.

(5) Cal-OAR implementation efforts were delayed due to the COVID-19 pandemic, and the state is now entering a phase that will allow reengagement in employment services activities as well as a renewed focus on the CalWORKs 2.0 and Cal-OAR structures.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that all of the following are accomplished:

(1) To restart robust conversations around CalWORKs 2.0
 and Cal-OAR and set an implementation timeline, including consideration of recommendations made in February 2020 by a legislatively mandated Cal-OAR workgroup. This effort should include development of training and resources for county CalWORKs staff in order to implement the necessary culture change within CalWORKs.

(2) To assist counties in developing and implementing training and resources for county CalWORKs staff, to reflect the racial, ethnic and cultural diversity of our families and communities in California and to promote equity and inclusion in CalWORKs policy and practice. Understanding and building on the steps counties have already taken in this regard is important to further building on that work statewide.

(3) To further the implementation of CalWORKs 2.0 and Cal-OAR statewide, it is the intent of the Legislature that the following steps will occur:

(A) Funding for intensive case management.

(B) Development of resources and training to assist counties in implementing program changes.

(C) Development of trauma-informed, anti-racist, and anti-stigma training for CalWORKs staff geared towards child and family well-being.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to consider approaches to the state’s management of the federal work participation rate to diminish its negating effects on the intentional culture and program shift for the CalWORKs program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 42.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

11523.5.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall convene and facilitate a Cal-OAR implementation steering committee (steering committee) no later than November 1, 2021. The steering committee shall make recommendations to the Legislature on how to implement Cal-OAR and CalWORKs 2.0 principles and practices statewide, and prioritize recommendations made by the Cal-OAR stakeholder group, by April 1, 2022. As part of the recommendations required pursuant to this subdivision, the steering committee shall provide its recommendations, including any recommendations for statutory amendments, and the reasons for these recommendations.

(b) The Cal-OAR implementation steering committee shall consist of representatives from the following organizations
 and stakeholders:

(1) The State Department of Social Services.

(2) The County Welfare Directors Association and its member county human services agencies.

(3) The exclusive representative of county CalWORKs staff.

(4) The Western Center on Law and Poverty.

(5) Parent Voices.

(6) Legislative staff.

(c) The steering committee may consult with other individuals, organizations, and entities as deemed appropriate for the purposes of implementing CalWORKs 2.0 and Cal-OAR.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 43.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

11523.6.

(a) Subject to an appropriation of funds for this purpose in the annual Budget Act, the State Department of Social Services shall contract for the development of training for county CalWORKs staff. The department shall enter into one or more contracts to develop this training no later than July 1, 2022.

(b) The department shall consult with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the exclusive representatives of county eligibility workers, client advocates, and other stakeholders, as deemed appropriate, in the development of this training. In developing the training, the department shall consider and draw upon, as appropriate, training and other materials already developed or in use by county human services agencies.

(c) The training required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall focus on all of the following:

(1) Resources to assist counties in implementing CalWORKs 2.0 and Cal-OAR and embedding these approaches into the program.

(2) Incorporating and building upon principles from CalWORKs 2.0, and relevant data from the Cal-OAR efforts, taking into account work counties have already accomplished in both areas of training focus.

(3) Acknowledging and addressing the intentional shift to a trauma-informed, anti-racist, anti-stigma, and implicit bias-aware culture and climate in the program, geared towards positive outcomes for child and family health and well-being.

(4) The impact of implicit bias, explicit
 bias, and systemic bias on public benefit programs and the effect this can have on individuals seeking eligibility for and services through public benefit programs.

(5) Actionable steps individuals can take to recognize and address their own implicit biases.

(d) The department shall work with the stakeholders listed in subdivision (b) to develop a plan for disseminating and delivering the training required pursuant to subdivision (a). This plan shall be shared with the Legislature no later than December 1, 2022. The plan shall include all of the following:

(1) The types and classifications of county staff who are to be trained and in what order the training of those staff should be prioritized.

(2) The entity or entities responsible for providing the
 training to counties, including consideration of providing direct training as well as train-the-trainer modes of training.

(3) The cost of providing the developed training to all identified staff in paragraph (1) in all counties.

(4) The proposed timeline for rolling out and implementing training in all counties.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts established pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services, including provisions pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825)
 of Part 5.5. of Division 3 of the Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 11546 of the Government Code, contracts established pursuant to this section are exempt from review or approval of any division of the Department of Technology, upon approval from the Department of Finance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 44.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

11523.7.

Payments, as determined by the State Department of Social Services, made to individuals serving either as individual participants or as a participant on an advisory group created by the State Department of Social Services, or the California Health and Human Services Agency, or through a user testing exercise through a contractor, for the purposes of this article shall not be taken into account as income or resources for purposes of determining the eligibility of that individual, or any other individual, for benefits or assistance, or the amount or extent of benefits or assistance, under any state or local program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 45.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.5. Interagency Data Development and Use [11525. - 11525.]

11525.

(a) The department shall establish procedures to provide timely access to information on CalWORKs families to counties and researchers in a manner that maintains confidentiality of data while making it possible to undertake ongoing monitoring, research, and evaluation.

(b) (1) The department, with the cooperation of the University of California, shall establish a project to link longitudinal administrative data on individuals and families who are receiving benefits under the CalWORKs program, or have received benefits under the program within the last 10 years.

(2) All data shall be made available to a university center with the capability of linking it with other appropriate data to allow for ongoing assessment of program impact.

(3) The department shall ensure that information identifiable to individuals and families is removed so as to maintain strict confidentiality.

(4) The State Department of Health Services, the Employment Development Department, the Franchise Tax Board, the State Department of Education, and any other state or local governmental agency that collects information on aided families shall provide the department with the necessary data, if legally available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 159.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.7. Role of the University [11526. - 11526.5.]

11526.

(a) The Legislature hereby requests the Regents of the University of California to establish and administer a program or programs to support welfare research and evaluation of the CalWORKs program.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the program or programs established by the University of California:

(1) Establish a sponsored grants program to provide funding for interested researchers to undertake studies on important welfare-related issues. These grants shall be applied only to research projects requested by representatives of state and local government entities.

(2) Establish one or more Bureau of the Census secure data sites to link census and administrative data bases for ongoing research purposes.

(3) Use existing data archives to develop data sets appropriate for monitoring and evaluating the impacts of CalWORKs program implementation in California.

(4) Create and maintain public use data sets and make data available to researchers and members of the public to support welfare research and related human services research.

(5) Provide an ongoing capacity for supporting, conducting, and disseminating welfare policy research.

(6) Produce and maintain lists of researchers working with California welfare data or conducting research on public assistance in California.

(7) Review, edit, publish, and disseminate research and evaluation reports to state and local policymakers.

(8) Provide forums for the presentation of research findings and the discussion of research on welfare.

(9) Provide a location for welfare data archives and monitor ongoing funding for their upkeep.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 160.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11526.5.

The department shall enter into an interagency agreement with the University of California for the purpose of implementing Section 11526. The interagency agreement shall be subject to funds appropriated for its purpose by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 606, Sec. 24.5.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. State Supplementary Program for Aged, Blind and Disabled [12000. - 12351.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [12000. - 12004.]

12000.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as The Burton-Moscone-Bagley Citizens’ Income Security Act for Aged, Blind and Disabled Californians.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

12001.

It is the intent of this chapter to implement a state supplementation program pursuant to Title XVI of the Social Security Act and a program for state services to the aged, blind or disabled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 43.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.

It is the object and purpose of this chapter to provide persons whose need results from age, blindness or disability with assistance and services which will encourage them to make greater efforts to achieve self-care and self-maintenance, whenever feasible, and to enlarge their opportunities for independence.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

12003.

For the purposes of this chapter, neither the residence nor domicile of the spouse shall be deemed the residence or domicile of the other, but each may have a separate residence or domicile dependent upon proof of the fact and not on legal presumption.

For the purposes of this chapter, a minor child shall be deemed to have resided in the state during any period in which such child has been physically present in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 122.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

12004.

The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed in favor of aged, blind and disabled recipients.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [12050. - 12054.]

12050.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(a) The term “aged, blind or disabled individual” means an individual who is 65 years or older, or is blind, or is disabled.

(b) “Aged” means an individual who is 65 years of age or older.

(c) An individual shall be considered “blind” as defined in Section 1614 of Part A of Title XVI of the Social Security Act.

(d) An individual shall be considered disabled as defined in Section 1614(a) of Part A of Title XVI of the Social Security Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

12051.

“Income” means both earned and unearned income as defined on October 30, 1972 in Part A of Title XVI of the Social Security Act, except as otherwise specifically provided.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

12052.

“Resources” means resources as defined on October 30, 1972 in Part A of Title XVI of the Social Security Act, except as otherwise specifically provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

12053.

An applicant’s share of his spouse’s community property income is defined as the income which is community property subject to the direction and control of the applicant, except for the earnings of his or her spouse.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

12054.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 978, Sec. 30.   Effective September 13, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Administration [12100. - 12105.]

12100.

The department shall enter into an agreement with the secretary providing for administration by the secretary of the provisions of this chapter. The agreement shall provide at least the following:

(a) That the secretary shall, on behalf of the state, make supplementary payments to an applicant or recipient under this chapter at such times and in such installments as may be agreed upon.

(b) That the state shall pay to the secretary an amount equal to expenditures made by the secretary as such supplemental payments less amounts payable by the federal government pursuant to Section 401 of Title IV of the Social Security Act Amendments of 1972.

(c) That the department may enter into an agreement to administer on behalf of the secretary and at the secretary’s expense all or such parts of the program under Title XVI of the Social Security Act during such portion of the fiscal year ending June 30, 1975, as may be provided in the agreement. In the event of such agreement, the department shall supervise the counties’ administration of all or such parts of the program under such agreement.

(d) The application of such procedural and other general provisions as are necessary and proper to achieve efficient and effective administration of the provisions of Title XVI of the Social Security Act and of this chapter, including a provision authorizing the secretary to conduct fair hearings in accordance with rules promulgated by him in cases concerning aid under this chapter.

(e) That the checks issued by the secretary containing the state supplemental payment shall clearly indicate by a separate notice accompanying the check or on the face of the check the fact that state funds are a part of the payment or the amount of check representing state funds.

(f) That to the extent permitted by law, the state shall audit the expenditures made by the secretary under such an agreement.

(g) That the state exercises its option to increase the payment level under Section 401(b)(1) of Title IV of the Social Security Act Amendments of 1972 by an amount equal to the sum of (A) and (B) of Section 401(b)(1) of that title.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

12100.5.

The department shall seek to enter into an agreement with the secretary for the purpose of administration by the secretary of the amount set forth in subdivision (h) of Section 12200.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1621, Sec. 1.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1621.)
-------------------------------------------

12101.

No applicant for or recipient of aid under this chapter shall be required to pay any part of the cost of a medical examination to determine blindness or disability as required by the department in connection with his application for or continued receipt of aid under this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

12102.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, no agreement entered into for state administration of the state supplementary payment program on behalf of the secretary or as agent of the federal government or otherwise, shall provide for any difference in administration of or eligibility for the state supplementary program than if such program were directly administered by the secretary pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

12103.

No authority is given under this chapter or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12500) or Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 13900) for any agreement with the secretary or any rules and regulations of the department which contain any provision requiring any form of liens or estate recovery, period of residency or citizenship for recipients under such chapters and no such liens or estate recovery, period of residency or citizenship for such recipients shall be imposed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

12104.

Notwithstanding any other law, upon the order of the Director of Finance, the Director of Social Services shall defer all supplemental payments to the federal government required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12100 in February 2010 and March 2010 and, instead, make payments for those months after April 20, 2010, but no later than May 31, 2010.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 633, Sec. 5) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 597.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12105.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall submit a report to the Legislature that includes recommendations on the administration of the State Supplementary Program for the Aged, Blind and Disabled to the Legislature no later than January 1, 2024. The recommendations shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Recommendations on whether the administration of the program should be shifted to the department.

(2) Anticipated impacts to the program if the state contracts with the government of another state or commonwealth of the United States for the administration of the program, or if the program is administered by the department.

(3) Potential efficiencies of savings or costs, if any, that might accrue to the state if a government of another state or commonwealth of the United States or the department administers the program.

(b) (1) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2028.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 259, Sec. 1.   (SB 973)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Eligibility [12150. - 12156.]

12150.

Persons who are receiving federal supplemental security income benefits, or who but for their income, are eligible to receive such benefits under Title XVI of the Social Security Act, or who are made eligible for supplemental benefits by other provisions of this chapter are entitled to receive state supplementation pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

12152.

In determining eligibility of any individual for the state supplementary payment administered by the federal government, in addition to any other income or resources disregarded by the secretary, the following additional amounts of income or resources of the individual shall be disregarded:

(a) Funds for readers, or educational scholarships, or both, which are not available to meet basic needs and which have been awarded by a high school, college, or university or a vocational or technical training institution to any recipient of aid to the aged, blind or disabled under this chapter due to his or her blindness while he or she is regularly attending any public school in this state, the University of California, or any other institution of higher learning in this state, shall not be deemed property, income, or resource of the recipient for any purpose and no deduction therefor shall be made from the recipient’s amount of aid.

(b) The value and the occupancy value of the home owned by the aged, blind or disabled individual or in combination with any other person if it serves to provide him or her with a home. In the event that this subdivision is in conflict with federal regulations pertaining to the value of such home, federal law shall supersede this subdivision with the respect to the value of such home. Persons who would otherwise be eligible under this chapter except for the value of their home, shall nevertheless be entitled to grants under this chapter at the same level as are established for persons whose home is within the federal home value limits. Payments for such persons shall, if federal law permits, be administered by the secretary. If federal law does not so permit, such grants shall be paid by the counties, and the costs, including administrative costs, shall be deducted from the individual county’s contribution required under Section 12400.

(c) Additional payments made from any source to a vendor in order to meet the needs of recipients as determined by the county welfare department.

(d) Any other exclusions provided for in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12500) and Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 13900).

(e) The value of the following items in the aggregate except that any amount paid in excess of one thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,800) or the dollar limit imposed by federal law, whichever is lower, shall not be disregarded:

(1) Money or securities placed in an irrevocable trust for funeral, cremation, or interment expenses with any of the trustees mentioned in Section 7736 of the Business and Professions Code or Section 8775 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Money or securities placed in an irrevocable trust created by a deposit in an insured savings institution made by one person of his or her own money in his or her own name as trustee for a funeral director to provide payment for funeral services rendered the funeral director upon the depositor’s death.

(3) Life or burial insurance purchased specifically for funeral, cremation, or interment expense, which is placed in an irrevocable trust or which has no loan or surrender value available to the recipient.

(4) Securities issued by a licensed cemetery authority which by their terms are convertible into payment for funeral, cremation, or interment expenses.

(f) Interment plots as defined in Section 7022 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1520, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

12153.

To the extent permitted by federal law, any recipient who meets the eligibility criteria of more than one classification of recipient described under this chapter as aged, blind or disabled, shall be permitted to select his classification of coverage.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

12156.

In determining, for purposes of this chapter, whether an individual is blind, there shall be an examination of such individual by a physician skilled in the diseases of the eye or by an optometrist, whichever the individual may select in accordance with applicable federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1141.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Payment of Aid [12200. - 12205.]

12200.

An aged, blind or disabled applicant or recipient shall be paid an amount of aid which when added to his or her federal benefit received under Part A of Title XVI of the Social Security Act and other nonexempt income and resources, equals the following:

(a) For a blind applicant or recipient, the sum of seven hundred four dollars ($704) per month and for a married couple both qualifying for benefits under this chapter as blind, the sum of one thousand three hundred seventy-two dollars ($1,372) per month. 

(b) For a married couple, both qualifying for benefits under this chapter, and one of whom is blind, the sum of one thousand two hundred ninety-five dollars ($1,295) per month. 

(c) For an aged or disabled applicant or recipient, the sum of six hundred thirty dollars ($630) per month. 

(d) For a married couple both qualifying for benefits under this chapter as aged or disabled, the sum of one thousand one hundred sixty-seven dollars ($1,167) per month.

(e) For an aged or disabled applicant or recipient under subdivision (c) or for a married couple under subdivision (d) whose living arrangement prevents preparation of his or her or their meals at home shall be entitled to an allowance of sixty-eight dollars ($68) per month for an individual and one hundred thirty-six dollars ($136) per month for a married couple in addition to any other amount he or she is entitled to under this chapter. 

(f) For a disabled minor under 18 living with a parent or guardian or relative by blood or marriage, the sum of four hundred ninety-nine dollars ($499) per month. 

(g) For a recipient in a nonmedical out-of-home care facility, the sum of seven hundred nine dollars ($709) per month. 

(h) For the personal and incidental needs of a person receiving care in a medical facility under the Medi-Cal Act, the sum of thirty dollars ($30) per month. The department shall issue, or arrange for the issuance from the appropriate state agency of, an additional twelve dollars ($12) each month to each recipient to whom this subdivision applies. 

(i) In the case of any individual, or couple, whose federal benefit received under Part A of Title XVI of the Social Security Act is reduced in accordance with Section 1612(a)(2)(A) of Public Law 92-603 because he lives in another person’s household and receives support and maintenance-in-kind from such person, the appropriate grant level set forth in subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this section shall be reduced by the amount of the reduction in the federal benefit, subject to the provisions in Section 12204. 

This subdivision shall be operative only during such time that such in-kind support and maintenance, under federal law, is treated as providing the basis for a lower payment standard rather than being treated as the receipt of unearned income.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 97, Sec. 14.   Effective June 30, 1991.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 30 of Ch. 97.)
-------------------------------------------

12200.01.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, commencing November 1, 1992, the payments schedules set forth in Section 12200 in effect on June 30, 1992, except subdivisions (e), (g), and (h) shall be reduced by 5.8 percent.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in no event shall the combined amount of the federal Supplementary Security Income payment and the state Supplementary State Program payment level for any applicant or recipient be reduced below the level required by the federal Social Security Act in order to maintain eligibility for federal funding under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 206, Sec. 16.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12200.015.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the maximum aid payments in effect on June 30, 1993, in accordance with Section 12200, as reduced by subdivision (a) of Section 12200.01, except subdivisions (e), (g), and (h) of Section 12200, shall be reduced by 2.7 percent beginning the first of the month following 60 days after the enactment of this section.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in no event shall the payment schedules be reduced below the level required by the federal Social Security Act in order to maintain eligibility for federal funding under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, contained in Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 206, Sec. 17.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12200.017.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the maximum aid payments in effect on June 30, 1994, in accordance with Section 12200, as reduced by subdivision (a) of Section 12200.01 and Section 12200.015, except subdivisions (e), (g), and (h) of Section 12200, shall be reduced by 2.3 percent effective September 1, 1994.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in no event shall any maximum aid payment schedule in any payment category established pursuant to Section 12200 be reduced below the level required by the federal Social Security Act in order to maintain eligibility for federal funding under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, contained in Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.
